Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2236
Nursing programs; failure to maintain standards; notice; discontinue; hearing.

If the board determines that any approved program of nursing is not maintaining the standards required by the statutes, rules, and regulations, notice in writing, specifying the defect or defects, shall be immediately given to the program. A program which fails to correct these conditions to the satisfaction of the board within a reasonable time shall be discontinued after hearing.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 15(5), p. 844;

Laws 1980, LB 847, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.28;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 792.